Montana, session 2025, HB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-10-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-10-101. Definitions -- practice of optometry. (1) The practice of optometry is the profession
constituting the art and science of visual care and includes any one of the following acts:
(a) the optometric examination or optometric diagnosis of all of those physiological or anatomical
parts or functions that consummate the process of human vision to ascertain the presence of abnormal
conditions or functions that may be optometrically diagnosed, corrected, remedied, or relieved, or enhanced;
(b) the employment of any optometric means for the purpose of detecting any condition of the
process of vision that may have any significance in a complete optometric eye and vision examination,
including the employment and administration of drugs topically applied for examination purposes, limited to
cycloplegics, mydriatics, topical anesthetics, dyes such as fluorescein, and for emergency use only, miotics;
(c) the application or prescription of ophthalmic lenses, contact lenses, prisms, orthoptics, visual
training, and any physical, mechanical, or physiological therapy and the furnishing or application of any
prosthetic or therapeutic devices for the correction or relief of visual or ocular anomalies;
(d) the administration, dispensation, and prescription of the oral analgesics codeine,
propoxyphene, hydrocodone, and dihydrocodeine, alone or in combination with nonscheduled or nonregulated
drugs; and
(e) the administration, dispensation, and prescription of those drugs approved by the board for use
in ocular treatment limited to the anterior segment of the eye and adnexa. Glaucoma may be treated.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 218
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 218
(2) Subsection (1) does not prohibit an optometrist from removing from the eye or adnexa a foreign
body that is not intraocular.
(3) Subsection (1) does not allow allows an optometrist to perform surgery or laser surgery for any
purpose in-office surgical procedures and laser surgical procedures limited to the anterior segment of the eye
and adnexa, excluding penetrating intraocular surgery, intravitreal injection, and refractive surgery. An
optometrist may perform laser surgical procedures only if the optometrist is certified by the board in accordance
with 37-10-302.
(4) Unless the context requires otherwise, in this chapter:
(a) "board" means the board of optometry provided for in 2-15-1736; and
(b) "department" means the department of labor and industry provided for in Title 2, chapter 15,
part 17."
Section 2. Section 37-10-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-10-302. Qualifications -- application. (1) The board shall adopt rules relative to and governing
the qualifications of applicants for licensure as optometrists and the qualifications for certification of licensed
optometrists to perform laser surgical procedures.
(2) A person is not eligible to receive a license unless that person is of good moral character.
(3) A person is not eligible to receive a license unless that person has graduated from an
accredited school of optometry in which the practice and science of optometry is taught in a course of study that
is accredited by the association of regulatory boards of optometry.
(4) An applicant for a license shall file a completed application on a form provided by the
department and pay a fee prescribed by the board.
(5) The board shall certify an optometrist to perform laser surgical procedures on verification that
the optometrist has successfully completed the required didactic and clinical training from an accredited
optometry school or college. The training must cover the use of lasers for medically recognized and appropriate
treatment of the human eye. On certification, the board shall issue a license indicating that the optometrist is
certified to perform laser surgery pursuant to this section."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 218
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 218
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 218
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 218, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 218
INTRODUCED BY E. BUTTREY, M. BERTOGLIO, L. JONES, R. MARSHALL, L. SMITH, J. ETCHART, B.
USHER, K. SEEKINS-CROWE, J. DARLING
AN ACT REVISING THE PRACTICE OF OPTOMETRY TO INCLUDE CERTAIN IN-OFFICE SURGICAL
PROCEDURES AND LASER SURGICAL PROCEDURES; AMENDING SECTIONS 37-10-101 AND 37-10-302,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.